Maryland, session 2026, HB1630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (3) (ii) 1. The fines collected by the District Court as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County
[and], ON Interstate 83 in Baltimore County, AND ON U.S. ROUTE 301 APPROACHING
THE INTERSECTIONS OF OR BETWEEN MARYLAND ROUTE 405 AND MARYLAND
ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY shall be remitted to the Comptroller for
distribution to the State Highway Administration to be used solely to:
A. Recover the cost of implementing and administering the
speed monitoring systems on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County [and], ON Interstate 83
in Baltimore County, AND ON U.S. ROUTE 301 APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS
OF OR BETWEEN MARYLAND ROUTE 405 AND MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN
ANNE’S COUNTY; and
B. Assist in covering the cost of roadway and safety
improvements on Interstate 695 in Baltimore County [and], ON Interstate 83 in Baltimore
County, AND ON U.S. ROUTE 301 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY.
2. Fines distributed to the State Highway Administration
under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph are supplemental to and are not intended
to take the place of funding that would otherwise be appropriated for uses described under
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph.
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means:

HOUSE BILL 1630 3
(i) A law enforcement agency of a local political subdivision that is
authorized to issue a citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic
laws or regulations;
(ii) For a municipal corporation that does not maintain a police force,
an agency established or designated by the municipal corporation to implement this
subtitle using speed monitoring systems in accordance with this section;
(iii) For speed monitoring systems placed and used on Interstate 83
in Baltimore County [or], Interstate 695 in Baltimore County, OR ON U.S. ROUTE 301
APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS OF OR BETWEEN MARYLAND ROUTE 405 AND
MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, the State Highway Administration;
or
(iv) For speed monitoring systems placed and used on Maryland
Route 200 (Intercounty Connector), the Maryland Transportation Authority.
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used by a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
2. The State Highway Administration may use speed
monitoring systems on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County [and], ON U.S. ROUTE 301
APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS OF OR BETWEEN MARYLAND ROUTE 405 AND
MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, AND Interstate 695 in Baltimore
County in accordance with this section.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
8. By the Maryland Transportation Authority on Maryland
Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery County; [or]
9. Subject to subparagraph (xii) of this paragraph, in
Montgomery County on a highway identified in the municipality’s, county’s, or State’s most
recent Strategic Highway Safety Plan or Vision Zero Plan as a highway that is at high risk
for motor vehicle crashes that result in serious bodily injury or death; OR
10. IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, BY THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION ON U.S. ROUTE 301 AT APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS OF

HOUSE BILL 1630
OR BETWEEN MARYLAND ROUTE 405 AND MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S
COUNTY.
(viii) Before activating a speed monitoring system, the local
jurisdiction, the State Highway Administration, or the Maryland Transportation
Authority, as appropriate, shall:
1. Publish notice of the location of the speed monitoring
system on its website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction;
2. Ensure that each sign that designates a school zone is
proximate to a sign that:
A. Indicates that speed monitoring systems are in use in the
school zone; and
B. Is in accordance with the manual for and the specifications
for a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article;
3. With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, based on proximity
to an institution of higher education under subparagraph (vi)3 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line, at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and
Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695
in Baltimore County, [or] on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery
County, OR ON U.S. ROUTE 301 APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS OF OR BETWEEN
MARYLAND ROUTE 405 AND MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY,
ensure that all speed limit signs approaching and within the segment of highway on which
the speed monitoring system is located include signs that:
A. Are in accordance with the manual and specifications for
a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; and
B. Indicate that a speed monitoring system is in use; and
4. With regard to a speed monitoring system placed on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, Interstate 83 in
Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road) between
the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard County
line, at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in
Talbot County, on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695 in Baltimore County,
[or] on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery County, OR ON U.S.

HOUSE BILL 1630 5
ROUTE 301 APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS OF OR BETWEEN MARYLAND
ROUTE 405 AND MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, ensure that each
sign that indicates that a speed monitoring system is in use is proximate to a device that
displays a real–time posting of the speed at which a driver is traveling.
(d) (2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, an agency may mail a warning notice instead of a citation to the owner liable
under subsection (c) of this section.
(ii) With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, an agency shall mail a warning notice instead of a citation
for a violation recorded by the speed monitoring system during the first 90 days that the
speed monitoring system is in operation.
(iii) With regard to a speed monitoring system established on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore County [or], Interstate 695 in Baltimore County, OR ON U.S.
ROUTE 301 APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS OF OR BETWEEN MARYLAND
ROUTE 405 AND MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, the State
Highway Administration shall mail a warning notice instead of a citation for a violation
recorded by the speed monitoring system during the first 30 days that the speed monitoring
system is in operation.
(k) (2) The report shall include:
(x) The locations at which each speed monitoring system was used
in the local jurisdiction, on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or Interstate 695 in Baltimore
County, [or] on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector), OR ON U.S. ROUTE 301
APPROACHING THE INTERSECTIONS OF OR BETWEEN MARYLAND ROUTE 405 AND
MARYLAND ROUTE 19 IN QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY;
(xi) The activation start and stop dates of each speed monitoring
system for each location at which it was used; and
(xii) The number of citations issued by each speed monitoring system
at each location.
(3) Each local jurisdiction with a speed monitoring system program, the
State Highway Administration, or the Maryland Transportation Authority shall submit the
information required under paragraph (2) of this subsection to the Commission by October
31 of each year and assist the Commission in the preparation of the annual report.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 6 years and 9 months and, at the
end of June 30, 2033, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.